California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 4.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

69.6.

Notwithstanding any other law, on and after April 1, 2021, the following shall apply:

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2.1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, any person over 55 years of age, any severely and permanently disabled person, or a victim of wildfire or natural disaster who resides in property that is eligible for either the homeowners’ exemption, under subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and Section 218, or the disabled veteran’s exemption, under subdivision (a) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and Section 205.5, may transfer, subject to the conditions and limitations provided in this section, the taxable value of that property to any replacement dwelling that is
 purchased or newly constructed by that person as their principal residence within two years of the sale by that person of the original property, provided that the taxable value of the original property shall not be transferred to the replacement dwelling until the original property is sold. A person shall not be allowed to transfer the taxable value of a primary residence pursuant to this section more than three times as a claimant who is over 55 years of age or severely or permanently disabled.

(b) In addition to meeting the requirements of subdivision (a), any person claiming the property tax relief provided by this section shall be eligible for that relief only if the following conditions are met:

(1) The claimant is an owner and a resident of the original property either at the time of its sale or within two years of the purchase or new construction of the replacement
 dwelling.

(2) The original property is eligible for the homeowners’ exemption or the disabled veteran’s exemption, as the result of the claimant’s ownership and occupation of the property as their principal residence, either at the time of its sale or within two years of the purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling.

(3) At the time of the sale of the original property, the claimant is over 55 years of age, is severely and permanently disabled, or is a victim of wildfire or natural disaster.

(4) At the time of claiming the property tax relief provided by subdivision (a), the claimant is an owner of a replacement dwelling and occupies it as their principal place of residence and, as a result thereof, the property is currently eligible for the homeowners’ exemption or the disabled veteran’s exemption, or
 would be eligible for the exemption except that the property is already receiving the exemption because of an exemption claim filed by the previous owner.

(5) The claimant sells the original property within two years of the purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling. For purposes of this paragraph:

(A) Either the sale of the original property or the purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling, but not both, may occur before April 1, 2021.

(B) The purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling includes the purchase of that portion of land on which the replacement building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode of the claimant will be situated and that constitutes a part of the replacement dwelling.

(6) The claimant has not previously been granted, as a claimant who is over 55 years of age or severely and permanently disabled, the property tax relief provided by this section more than two times. This limitation shall not apply to claimants who are victims of wildfire or natural disaster. In order to prevent more than three claims under this section within this state per person, each county assessor shall report quarterly to the State Board of Equalization that information from claims filed and from county records as is specified by the board to be necessary to identify fully all claims under this section allowed by assessors and all claimants who have thereby received relief. The board may specify that the information include all or a part of the names and social security numbers of claimants and the identity and location of the replacement dwelling to which the claim applies. The information may be required in the form of data processing media or other media and in a format that is
 compatible with the recordkeeping processes of the counties and the auditing procedures of the state.

(c) (1) To receive the property tax relief under this section, a claim shall be filed within three years of the date the replacement dwelling was purchased or the new construction of the replacement dwelling was completed.

(2) A claim for transfer of taxable value under this section that is filed after the expiration of the filing period set forth in paragraph (1) shall be considered by the assessor, subject to both of the following conditions:

(A) Any base year value transfer granted pursuant to that claim shall apply, commencing with the lien date of the assessment year in which the claim is filed.

(B) The full cash value of the
 replacement dwelling in the assessment year described in subparagraph (A) shall be the base year value of the real property in the assessment year in which the base year value was transferred, factored to the assessment year described in subparagraph (A) for all of the following:

(i) Inflation as annually determined in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(ii) Any subsequent new construction occurring with respect to the subject real property that does not qualify for property tax relief pursuant to the criteria set forth in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (e).

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Person over 55 years of age” means any person who
 has attained the age of 55 years or older at the time of the sale of the original property.

(2) “Taxable value of the original property” means its base year value, as determined in accordance with Section 110.1, with the adjustments permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution and subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, determined as of the date that the original property is sold by the claimant, or in the case where the original property has been substantially damaged or destroyed by wildfire or natural disaster and the owner does not rebuild on the original property, determined as of the date immediately before the wildfire or natural disaster.

(3) “Replacement dwelling” means a building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, that is owned and occupied by a claimant as the
 claimant’s principal place of residence, and any land owned by the claimant on which the building, structure, or other shelter is situated. For purposes of this paragraph, land constituting a part of a replacement dwelling includes only that area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence, and “land owned by the claimant” includes land for which the claimant either holds a leasehold interest described in subdivision (c) of Section 61 or a land purchase contract. Each unit of a multiunit dwelling shall be considered a separate replacement dwelling. For purposes of this paragraph, “area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence” includes all land if any nonresidential uses of the property are only incidental to the use of the property as a residential site. For purposes of this paragraph, “land owned by the claimant” includes an ownership interest in a resident-owned mobilehome park that is assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 62.1.

(4) “Original property” means a building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, that is owned and occupied by a claimant as the claimant’s principal place of residence, and any land owned by the claimant on which the building, structure, or other shelter is situated. For purposes of this paragraph, land constituting a part of the original property includes only that area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence, and “land owned by the claimant” includes land for which the claimant either holds a leasehold interest described in subdivision (c) of Section 61 or a land purchase contract. Each unit of a multiunit dwelling shall be considered a separate original property. For purposes of this paragraph, “area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence” includes all land if any nonresidential uses of the property are only incidental to the use of the
 property as a residential site. For purposes of this paragraph, “land owned by the claimant” includes an ownership interest in a resident-owned mobilehome park that is assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 62.1.

(5) For purposes of this section, an original dwelling or replacement dwelling shall not be considered a multiunit dwelling if: (A) there is a dwelling unit on the property, (B) the only other units on the real property are accessory dwelling units or junior accessory dwelling units, (C) any accessory dwelling units and junior accessory dwelling units are not separately alienable from the title of any other dwelling unit on the property, and (D) the claimant occupies one of the structures as their primary residence.

(6) For the purposes of this subdivision, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (e), if the replacement dwelling is, in part,
 purchased and, in part, newly constructed, the date the “replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed” is the date of purchase or the date of completion of construction, whichever is later.

(7) “Full cash value of the replacement dwelling” means its full cash value, determined in accordance with Section 110.1, as of the date on which it was purchased or new construction was completed, and after the purchase or the completion of new construction.

(8) “Full cash value of the original property” means either of the following, as applicable:

(A) Its new base year value, in accordance with Section 75.8, without the application of subdivision (c) of Section 2.1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, plus the adjustments permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article
 XIIIA and subdivision (f) of Section 110.1 for the period from the date of its sale by the claimant to the date on which the replacement dwelling was purchased or new construction was completed.

(B) In the case where the original property has been substantially damaged or destroyed by wildfire or natural disaster and the owner does not rebuild on the original property, its full cash value, as determined in accordance with Section 110, immediately before its substantial damage or destruction by wildfire or natural disaster, as determined by the assessor of the county in which the property is located, without the application of subdivision (c) of Section 2.1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, plus the adjustments permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, for the period from
 the date of its sale by the claimant to the date on which the replacement property was purchased or new construction was completed.

(9) “Sale” means any change in ownership of the original property for consideration.

(10) “Claimant” means any person claiming the property tax relief provided by this section.

(11) “Property that is eligible for the homeowners’ exemption” includes property that is the principal place of residence of its owner and is entitled to exemption pursuant to Section 205.5.

(12) “Person” means any individual, but does not include any firm, partnership, association, corporation, company, or other legal entity or organization of any kind. “Person” includes an individual who is the present beneficiary of a trust.

(13) “Equal or lesser value” means that the amount of the full cash value of a replacement dwelling does not exceed one of the following:

(A) One hundred percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed prior to the date of the sale of the original property.

(B) One hundred and five percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed within the first year following the date of the sale of the original property.

(C) One hundred and ten percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed within the second year following
 the date of the sale of the original property.

(14) For the purposes of this section, original property is “substantially damaged or destroyed by wildfire or natural disaster” if either the land or the improvements sustain physical damage amounting to more than 50 percent of either the land’s or the improvement’s full cash value immediately before the wildfire or natural disaster. Damage includes a diminution in the value of the original property as a result of restricted access caused by the wildfire or natural disaster.

(e) (1) Upon the timely filing of a claim described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the assessor shall adjust the new base year value of the replacement dwelling in conformity with this section. This adjustment shall be made as of the latest of the following dates:

(A) The
 date the original property is sold.

(B) The date the replacement dwelling is purchased.

(C) The date the new construction of the replacement dwelling is completed.

(2) If the full cash value of the replacement dwelling is of equal or lesser value than that of the original property, the taxable value shall be deemed to be the taxable value of the original property.

(3) If the full cash value of the replacement dwelling is of greater value than the original property, the taxable value of the replacement dwelling shall be calculated by adding the difference between the full cash value of the original property and the full cash value of the replacement dwelling to the taxable value of the original property.

(4) If the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed after the transfer of the original property, “taxable value of the original property” also includes any inflation factor adjustments permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 110.1 for the period subsequent to the sale of the original property. The base year or years used to compute the “taxable value of the original property” shall be deemed to be the base year or years of any property to which that base year value is transferred pursuant to this section.

(5) Any taxes that were levied on the replacement dwelling prior to the filing of the claim on the basis of the replacement dwelling’s new base year value, and any allowable annual adjustments thereto, shall be canceled or refunded to the claimant to the extent that the taxes exceed the amount that would be due when determined on the basis of the adjusted new base year
 value.

(6) Notwithstanding Section 75.10, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) shall be utilized for purposes of implementing this subdivision, including adjustments of the new base year value of replacement dwellings acquired prior to the sale of the original property.

(7) In the case when a claim under this section has been timely filed and granted, and new construction is performed upon the replacement dwelling subsequent to the transfer of base year value, the property tax relief provided by this section also shall apply to the replacement dwelling, as improved, and thus there shall be no reassessment upon completion of the new construction if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The new construction is completed within two years of the date of the sale of the original property and the owner notifies
 the assessor in writing of completion of the new construction within six months after completion.

(B) The fair market value of the new construction on the date of completion, plus the full cash value of the replacement dwelling on the date of acquisition, is not more than the full cash value of the original property as determined pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (d) for purposes of granting the original claim.

(f) A claim filed under this section is not a public document and is not subject to public inspection, except that a claim shall be available for inspection by the claimant or the claimant’s spouse, the claimant’s or the claimant’s spouse’s legal representative, the trustee of a trust in which the claimant or the claimant’s spouse is a present beneficiary, and the executor or administrator of the claimant’s or the claimant’s spouse’s estate.

(g) (1) After consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, the Board of Equalization shall, by emergency regulation, adopt regulations and produce claim forms and instructions necessary to implement this section and Section 2.1 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution.

(2) Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 312, Sec. 4.   (SB 890)   Effective October 4, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. New Construction [70. - 74.8.]

70.

(a) “Newly constructed” and “new construction” means:

(1) Any addition to real property, whether land or improvements, including fixtures, since the last lien date; and

(2) Any alteration of land or of any improvement, including fixtures, since the last lien date that constitutes a major rehabilitation thereof or that converts the property to a different use.

(b) Any rehabilitation, renovation, or modernization that converts an improvement or fixture to the substantial equivalent of a new improvement or fixture is a major rehabilitation of that improvement or fixture.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), where real property has been damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity, “newly constructed” and “new construction” does not mean any timely reconstruction of the real property, or portion thereof, where the property after reconstruction is substantially equivalent to the property prior to damage or destruction. Any reconstruction of real property, or portion thereof, that is not substantially equivalent to the damaged or destroyed property, shall be deemed to be new construction and only that portion that exceeds substantially equivalent reconstruction shall have a new base year value determined pursuant to Section 110.1.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), where a tank must be improved, upgraded, or replaced to comply with federal, state, and local regulations on underground storage tanks, “newly
 constructed” and “new construction” does not mean the improvement, upgrade, or replacement of a tank to meet compliance standards, and the improvement, upgrade, or replacement shall be considered to have been performed for the purpose of normal maintenance and repair.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), where a structure, or any portion thereof, was reconstructed, as a consequence of completing work on an underground storage tank to comply with federal, state, and local regulations on these tanks, timely reconstruction of the structure shall be considered to have been performed for the purpose of normal maintenance and repair where the structure, or portion thereof, after reconstruction is substantially equivalent to the prior structure in size, utility, and function.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 2008.   Operative June 9, 2010, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 336, pursuant to adoption of Prop. 13 (SCA 4) at the June 8, 2010, election.)
-------------------------------------------

70.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 70, and pursuant to Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, the base year value of property that is substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster, as declared by the Governor, may be applied to replacement property reconstructed on the site of the damaged or destroyed property within five years after the disaster as a replacement for the substantially damaged or destroyed property if that reconstructed property is comparable to the substantially damaged or destroyed property. A person who owns substantially damaged or destroyed property that receives property tax relief under this section
 shall not be eligible for property tax relief provided under Section 69.

(b) (1) The replacement base year value of the reconstructed property shall be determined in accordance with this section.

(2) The assessor shall use the following procedure in determining the appropriate base year value of the reconstructed property:

(A) If the full cash value of the reconstructed property does not exceed 120 percent of the full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed, then the adjusted base year value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall apply to the reconstructed property as its base year value.

(B) If the full
 cash value of the reconstructed property exceeds 120 percent of the full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed, then the amount of the full cash value over 120 percent of the full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall be added to the adjusted base year value of the original property substantially damaged or destroyed. The sum of these amounts shall become the reconstructed property’s base year value.

(C) If the full cash value of the reconstructed property is less than the adjusted base year value of the original property substantially damaged or destroyed, then that lower value shall become the reconstructed property’s base year value.

(D) The full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall be the
 amount of its full cash value immediately prior to its substantial damage or destruction, as determined by the county assessor of the county in which the property is located.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) Property is substantially damaged or destroyed if the improvements sustain physical damage amounting to more than 50 percent of the improvements’ full cash value immediately prior to the disaster.

(2) Reconstructed property shall be considered comparable to the original property substantially damaged or destroyed if it is similar in size, utility, and function to the property which it replaces. For purposes of this paragraph:

(A) Property is similar
 in function if the reconstructed property is subject to similar governmental restrictions, such as zoning.

(B) (i) Both the size and utility of property are interrelated and associated with value. Property shall be considered similar in size and utility only to the extent that the reconstructed property is, or is intended to be, used in the same manner as the original property substantially damaged or destroyed and its full cash value does not exceed 120 percent of the full cash value of the original property substantially damaged or destroyed.

(ii) A reconstructed property or any portion of reconstructed property used or intended to be used for a purpose substantially different than the use made of the original property substantially damaged or destroyed shall to
 the extent of the dissimilar use be considered not similar in utility.

(iii) A reconstructed property or any portion of reconstructed property that satisfies the use requirement but has a full cash value that exceeds 120 percent of the full cash value of the original property substantially damaged or destroyed shall be considered, to the extent of the excess, not similar in utility and size.

(C) To the extent that reconstructed property or any portion of reconstructed property is not similar in function, size, and utility, the property or portion of that property shall be considered to be newly constructed.

(3) “Disaster” means a major misfortune or calamity in an area subsequently proclaimed by the Governor to be in a
 state of disaster as a result of that misfortune or calamity.

(d) Only the owner or owners of the property substantially damaged or destroyed, whether one or more individuals, partnerships, corporations, other legal entities, or a combination thereof, shall be eligible to receive property tax relief under this section. Relief under this section shall be granted to an owner or owners of substantially damaged or destroyed property who have reconstructed that property.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any law, the time period specified in subdivision (a) to apply the base year value of qualified property to replacement property reconstructed on the site of the damaged or destroyed property is extended by three years if the qualified property was substantially damaged
 or destroyed on or after November 1, 2018, but on or before November 30, 2018.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to the determination of base year values for the 2018–19 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified property” means property that was substantially damaged or destroyed, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), by the 2018 Woolsey Fire disaster or by the 2018 Camp Fire disaster, as proclaimed by the Governor.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any law, the time period specified in subdivision (a) to apply the base year value of qualified property to replacement property reconstructed on the site of the damaged or destroyed property is extended by
 three years if the qualified property was substantially damaged or destroyed on or after November 1, 2024, but before February 1, 2025.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to the determination of base year values for the 2025–26 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified property” means property that was substantially damaged or destroyed, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), by the 2025 Palisades Fire, Eaton Fire, Hurst Fire, Lidia Fire, Sunset Fire, or Woodley Fire, or the 2024 Mountain Fire or Franklin Fire, for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency.

(g) This section shall apply to real property damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity on or
 after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 549, Sec. 1.   (SB 663)   Effective October 10, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

71.

The assessor shall determine the new base year value for the portion of any taxable real property which has been newly constructed. The base year value of the remainder of the property assessed, which did not undergo new construction, shall not be changed. New construction in progress on the lien date shall be appraised at its full value on that date and each lien date thereafter until the date of completion, at which time the entire portion of property which is newly constructed shall be reappraised at its full
 value, and that value shall be the base year value. New construction in progress shall not acquire a base year value on each lien date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 80, Sec. 2.   (AB 652)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

72.

(a) A copy of any building permit issued by any city, county, city and county, or any entity authorized to issue a building permit shall be transmitted by each issuing entity to the county assessor as soon as possible after the date of issuance.

(b) A copy of any certificate of occupancy or other document that shows the date of completion of new construction issued or finalized by any city, county, city and county, or any entity authorized to issue a building permit, shall be transmitted by each entity to the county assessor within 30 days after the date of issuance or finalization.

(c) At the time an assessee files, or
 causes to be filed, an approved set of building plans with the issuing entity a scale copy of the floor plans and exterior dimensions of the building designated for the county assessor shall be filed by the assessee or the assessee’s designee. The scale copy shall be in sufficient detail to allow the assessor to determine the square footage of the building and, in the case of a residential building, the intended use of each room. The county assessor may require the floor plans be provided to the county assessor in an electronic format, if available. An assessee, or the assessee’s designee, where multiple units are to be constructed from the same set of building plans, may file only one scale copy of floor plans and exterior dimensions, so long as each application for a building permit with respect to those building plans specifically identifies the scale copy filed pursuant to this section. However,
 where the square footage of any one of the multiple units is altered, an assessee, or the assessee’s designee, shall file a scale copy of the floor plan and exterior dimensions that specifically identifies the alteration from the previously filed scale copy. The receiving authority shall transmit that copy to the county assessor as soon as possible after the final plans are approved.

(d) The board of supervisors of a county may enact, by a majority vote of its entire membership, an ordinance, resolution, or board order that requires the local agency that approves the tentative map or maps, and any conditions of approval for the tentative map or maps that are filed with a county or a city in that county, to submit a copy of the map or maps, and any conditions of approval for the tentative map or maps, to the county assessor as soon as
 possible after the map or maps are filed. The ordinance, resolution, or board order may require that the map or maps be provided to the county assessor in an electronic format, if available in that form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 329, Sec. 18.   (SB 780)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

73.

(a) Pursuant to the authority granted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, the term “newly constructed,” as used in subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, does not include the construction or addition of any active solar energy system, as defined in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) “Active solar energy system” means a system that, upon completion of the construction of a system as part of a new property or the addition of a system to an existing property, uses solar devices, which are thermally isolated
 from living space or any other area where the energy is used, to provide for the collection, storage, or distribution of solar energy.

(2) “Active solar energy system” does not include solar swimming pool heaters or hot tub heaters.

(3) Active solar energy systems may be used for any of the following:

(A) Domestic, recreational, therapeutic, or service water heating.

(B) Space conditioning.

(C) Production of electricity.

(D) Process heat.

(E) Solar mechanical energy.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “occupy or use” has the same meaning as defined in Section 75.12.

(d) (1) (A) The Legislature finds and declares that the definition of spare parts in this paragraph is declarative of the intent of the Legislature, in prior statutory enactments of this section that excluded active solar energy systems from the term “newly constructed,” as used in the California Constitution, thereby creating a tax appraisal exclusion.

(B) An active solar energy system that uses solar energy in the production of electricity includes storage devices, power conditioning
 equipment, transfer equipment, and parts related to the functioning of those items. In general, the use of solar energy in the production of electricity involves the transformation of sunlight into electricity through the use of devices such as solar cells or other solar collecting equipment. However, an active solar energy system used in the production of electricity includes only equipment used up to, but not including, the stage of conveyance or use of the electricity. For the purpose of this paragraph, the term “parts” includes spare parts that are owned by the owner of, or the maintenance contractor for, an active solar energy system that uses solar energy in the production of electricity and which spare parts were specifically purchased, designed, or fabricated by or for that owner or maintenance contractor for installation in an active solar energy system that uses solar energy in the production of electricity,
 thereby including those parts in the tax appraisal exclusion created by this section.

(2) An active solar energy system that uses solar energy in the production of electricity also includes pipes and ducts that are used exclusively to carry energy derived from solar energy. Pipes and ducts that are used to carry both energy derived from solar energy and from energy derived from other sources are active solar energy system property only to the extent of 75 percent of their full cash value.

(3) An active solar energy system that uses solar energy in the production of electricity does not include auxiliary equipment, such as furnaces and hot water heaters, that use a source of power other than solar energy to provide usable energy. An active solar energy system that uses solar
 energy in the production of electricity does include equipment, such as ducts and hot water tanks, that is utilized by both auxiliary equipment and solar energy equipment, that is, dual use equipment. That equipment is active solar energy system property only to the extent of 75 percent of its full cash value.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of this section, “the construction or addition of any active solar energy system” includes the construction of an active solar energy system incorporated by the owner-builder in the initial construction of a new building that the owner-builder does not intend to occupy or use. The exclusion from “newly constructed” provided by this subdivision applies to the initial purchaser who purchased the new building from the owner-builder, but only if the owner-builder
 did not receive an exclusion under this section for the same active solar energy system and only if the initial purchaser purchased the new building prior to that building becoming subject to reassessment to the owner-builder, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 75.12. The assessor shall administer this subdivision in the following manner:

(A) The initial purchaser of the building shall file a claim with the assessor and provide to the assessor any documents necessary to identify the value attributable to the active solar energy system included in the purchase price of the new building. The claim shall also identify the amount of any rebate for the active solar energy system provided to either the owner-builder or the initial purchaser by the Public Utilities Commission, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development
 Commission, an electrical corporation, a local publicly owned electric utility, or any other agency of the State of California.

(i) (I) The claim for an exclusion under this subdivision shall be considered timely if it is filed within three years of the date of purchase.

(II) An otherwise valid claim for exclusion under this subdivision filed after the deadline set by subclause (I) shall be applied beginning on the lien date of the assessment year in which the claim is filed.

(ii) The provisions of clause (i) shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(B) The assessor shall evaluate the claim and determine the portion of the
 purchase price that is attributable to the active solar energy system. The assessor shall then reduce the new base year value established as a result of the change in ownership of the new building by an amount equal to the difference between the following two amounts:

(i) That portion of the value of the new building attributable to the active solar energy system.

(ii) The total amount of all rebates, if any, described in subparagraph (A) that were provided to either the owner-builder or the initial purchaser.

(C) The extension of the new construction exclusion to the initial purchaser of a newly constructed new building shall remain in effect only until there is a subsequent change in ownership of the new
 building.

(2) The State Board of Equalization, in consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, shall prescribe the manner, documentation, and form for claiming the new construction exclusion required by this subdivision.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the exclusion from new construction provided by this section shall remain in effect only until there is a subsequent change in ownership.

(g) This section applies to property tax lien dates for the 1999–2000 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision apply beginning with the lien date for the 2008–09 fiscal
 year.

(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), active energy solar systems that qualify for an exclusion under this section prior to January 1, 2027, shall continue to be excluded on and after January 1, 2027, until there is a subsequent change in ownership.

(j) Section 41 shall not apply to the extension of the exclusion under this section made by the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 328, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 710)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section inapplicable after the 2025-26 fiscal year as provided in subd. (g).    Inoperative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

74.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIII A of the Constitution, “newly constructed” does not include the construction or installation of any fire sprinkler system, other fire extinguishing system, fire detection system, or fire-related egress improvement that is constructed or installed on or after November 7, 1984.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75), neither “newly constructed” nor “new construction” includes the construction or installation of any fire sprinkler system, other fire extinguishing system, fire detection system, or fire-related egress improvement that is constructed or installed on or after November 7, 1984.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Fire sprinkler system” means any system intended to discharge water for the purpose of suppressing or extinguishing a fire, and includes a fire sprinkler system that derives its water from the domestic water supply of the building or structure of which it is a part.
